Alabama, session 2026rs, HB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Shelby County Commission, by
resolution, may authorize the sale to public or private
parties of the gas, minerals, or other commodities created by
the operation of its public landfill where solid waste is
collected, stored, and disposed.
(b) The sale of gas, minerals, or other commodities
pursuant to this section shall be made under contractual
agreement entered into by free and open competitive bidding,
on sealed bids, to the lowest responsible and responsive
bidder.
(c) Contracts for the sale of gas, minerals, or other
commodities shall not be awarded for periods greater than 20
years.
(d)(1) The proceeds of the sale of gas, minerals, or
other commodities under this section shall be deposited into
the General Fund of Shelby County.
(2) The proceeds shall be used for the collection and
disposal of solid waste; maintenance and construction of the
landfill, including the landfill gas collection system; and
for other legally allowed purposes.
Page 1

for other legally allowed purposes.
HB532 Enrolled
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB532 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 12-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3